Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1723
Ownership of a share account; rights.

Ownership of a share account shall confer membership and voting rights and shall represent an interest in the capital of the credit union upon dissolution or conversion to another type of institution.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 23.